New Jersey, session 221, A152.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no State agency, or representative or employee thereof, shall: (1)   enter any agreement or arrangement with the appropriate representatives of other states, including the formation of a for-profit or non-profit corporation, any form of association, alliance, compact, or commission, or any other form of organization, in this or another state, established for the purpose of creating a cap and trade program for carbon emissions from combustion gas and diesel engines or any similar multi-state program that would cap and reduce the amount of allowable carbon emissions from the combustion of transportation fuels; or (2)   adopt any rules or regulations that would establish a multi-state cap and trade program to limit carbon emissions from combustion gas and diesel engines or any similar program that would cap and reduce the amount of allowable carbon emissions from the combustion of transportation fuels. b.    Any action taken by a State agency, or representative or employee thereof, prior to the date of enactment of this act that is inconsistent with the prohibition established pursuant to subsection a. of this section is hereby invalidated, and the State agency, or representative or employee thereof, as appropriate, shall take all necessary action to withdraw from the agreement or arrangement. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.